Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.110

Review of initial policies adopted under RCW 43.180.090 and 43.180.100—Adoption—Change.

The commission shall submit the initial policies adopted under RCW 43.180.090 and 43.180.100 to the chief clerk of the house and the secretary of the senate for transmittal to and review by the appropriate standing committees and the joint administrative rules review committee. By January 1, 1984 the commission shall have adopted policies in the form of rules and regulations under chapter 34.05 RCW. Such rules and regulations may only be changed or revised in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1983 c 161 s 11.]